Utah statutes.
17-23-12.   Additional powers.
The county surveyor may:
(1)  administer oaths or affirmations necessary to legally establish roads and
other surveys;
(2)  take evidence from any person who may have information to prove any point
material to a survey or whenever necessary in the discharge of his official
duties; and
(3)  establish procedures and guidelines to govern the electronic submission
of plats, records, and other documents to the county surveyor's office
consistent with Title 46, Chapter 4, Uniform Electronic Transactions Act.
